Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.420

Alternative direct petition method—Notice to legislative body—Meeting—Assumption of indebtedness—Proposed zoning regulation—Contents of petition.

(1) Proceedings for initiating annexation of unincorporated territory to a charter code city or noncharter code city may be commenced by the filing of a petition of property owners of the territory proposed to be annexed, in the following manner which is alternative to other methods provided in this chapter:

(a) Before the circulation of a petition for annexation, the initiating party or parties, who shall be the owners of not less than ten percent of the acreage for which annexation is sought, shall notify the legislative body of the code city in writing of their intention to commence annexation proceedings;

(b) The legislative body shall set a date, not later than sixty days after the filing of the request, for a meeting with the initiating parties to determine whether the code city will accept, reject, or geographically modify the proposed annexation, whether it shall require the simultaneous adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, if such a proposal has been prepared and filed for the area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340, and whether it shall require the assumption of all or any portion of existing city indebtedness by the area to be annexed;

(c) If the legislative body requires the assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness and/or the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, it shall record this action in its minutes and the petition for annexation shall be so drawn as to clearly indicate these facts;

(d) Approval by the legislative body shall be a condition precedent to circulation of the petition; and

(e) There shall be no appeal from the decision of the legislative body.

(2) A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a code city may be filed with the legislative body of the municipality to which annexation is desired. The petition for annexation must be signed by the owners of a majority of the acreage for which annexation is petitioned and a majority of the registered voters residing in the area for which annexation is petitioned.

(3) If no residents exist within the area proposed for annexation, the petition must be signed by the owners of a majority of the acreage for which annexation is petitioned.

(4) The petition shall set forth a legal description of the property proposed to be annexed that complies with RCW 35A.14.410, and shall be accompanied by a drawing that outlines the boundaries of the property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required the assumption of all or any portion of city indebtedness by the area annexed or the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, these facts, together with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement, or requirements, shall also be set forth in the petition.

[ 2003 c 331 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.